Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2326.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 121A.031, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Safe and supportive schools programming. (a) Districts and schools deleted text begin are encouraged todeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end provide developmentally appropriate programmatic instruction to help students identify, prevent, and reduce prohibited conduct; value diversity in school and society; develop and improve students' knowledge and skills for solving problems, managing conflict, engaging in civil discourse, and recognizing, responding to, and reporting prohibited conduct; and make effective prevention and intervention programs available to students. Districts and schools must establish strategies for creating a positive school climate and use evidence-based social-emotional learning to prevent and reduce discrimination and other improper conduct. (b) Districts and schools are encouraged to: (1) engage all students in creating a safe and supportive school environment; (2) partner with parents and other community members to develop and implement prevention and intervention programs; (3) engage all students and adults in integrating education, intervention, and other remedial responses into the school environment; (4) train student bystanders to intervene in and report incidents of prohibited conduct to the school's primary contact person; (5) teach students to advocate for themselves and others; (6) prevent inappropriate referrals to special education of students who may engage in prohibited conduct; and (7) foster student collaborations that foster a safe and supportive school climate. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 121A.031, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. State model policy. (a) The commissioner, in consultation with the commissioner of human rights, shall develop and maintain a state model policy. A district or school that does not adopt and implement a local policy under subdivisions 3 to 5 must implement and may supplement the provisions of the state model policy. The commissioner must assist districts and schools under this subdivision to implement the state policy. The state model policy must: (1) define prohibited conduct, consistent with this section; (2) apply the prohibited conduct policy components in this section; (3) for a child with a disability, whenever an evaluation by an individualized education program team or a section 504 team indicates that the child's disability affects the child's social skills development or the child is vulnerable to prohibited conduct because of the child's disability, the child's individualized education program or section 504 plan may address the skills and proficiencies the child needs to not engage in and respond to such conduct; and (4) encourage violence prevention and character development education programs under section 120B.232, subdivision 1. (b) The commissioner shall develop and post departmental procedures for: (1) periodically reviewing district and school programs and policies for compliance with this section; (2) investigating, reporting, and responding to noncompliance with this section, deleted text begin which may includedeleted text end new text begin includingnew text end an annual review of plans to improve and provide a safe and supportive school climate; and (3) allowing students, parents, and educators to file a complaint about noncompliance with the commissionernew text begin , including a clear process for follow-up on complaints received and an annual review process for districts or schools receiving a substantial number of complaints during an academic yearnew text end . (c) The commissioner must post on the department's website information indicating that when districts and schools allow non-curriculum-related student groups access to school facilities, the district or school must give all student groups equal access to the school facilities regardless of the content of the group members' speech. (d) The commissioner must develop and maintain resources to assist a district or school in implementing strategies for creating a positive school climate and use evidence-based, social-emotional learning to prevent and reduce discrimination and other improper conduct.